California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
Out of the first money realized from the sale of bonds as provided herein, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund, established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, the amount of all expenditures made for the purposes specified in that section, and this money may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional bond sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.312.

Any bonds issued and sold pursuant to this article may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The approval of the voters for the issuance of bonds under this article includes approval for the issuance of bonds issued to refund bonds originally issued or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.313.

Notwithstanding any provision of the bond act, if the Treasurer sells bonds under this article for which bond counsel has issued an opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excludable from gross income for purposes of federal income tax, subject to any conditions which may be designated, the Treasurer may establish separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the earnings on those proceeds, and may use those proceeds or earnings to pay any
 rebate, penalty, or other payment required by federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of bond proceeds required or permitted under federal law necessary to maintain the tax-exempt status of the bonds or to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.314.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this article are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by Article XIIIB.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.315.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any bonds issued and sold under the Veterans Bond Act of 1982, and the Veterans Bond Act of 1984 may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, without regard to the first sentence of Section 16786 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5x. Veterans’ Bond Act of 2008 [998.400. - 998.414.]

998.400.

This article may be cited as the Veterans’ Bond Act of 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.401.

(a) The State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to
 “herein” refer both to this article and that law.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the Department of Veterans Affairs is designated the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.402.

As used herein, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(b) “Bond” means a veterans’ bond, a state general obligation bond, issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(c) “Bond act” means this article authorizing the issuance of state general obligation bonds and adopting the State General Obligation Bond Law by reference.

(d) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, established by Section 991.

(e) “Fund” means the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, established by Section 988.

(f) “Payment Fund” means the Veterans’ Bonds Payment Fund established by Section 988.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 27, Sec. 3.   (AB 2651)   Effective June 15, 2010.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, and approved in Prop. 12 on Nov. 4, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

998.403.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 (Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 987.50)), and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the committee may create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of not more than three hundred million dollars
 ($300,000,000), exclusive of refunding bonds, in the manner provided herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 2.   (AB 639)   Effective October 10, 2013.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, and approved in Prop. 12 on Nov. 4, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

998.404.

(a) All bonds authorized by this article, when duly sold and delivered as provided herein, constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

(b) There shall be
 collected annually, in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, a sum of money, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, sufficient to pay the principal of, and interest on, these bonds as provided herein, and all officers required by law to perform any duty in regard to the collection of state revenues shall collect this additional sum.

(c) On the dates on which funds are to be remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of debt service on the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be transferred to the Payment Fund to pay the debt service all of the money in the fund, not in excess of the amount of debt service then due and payable. If the money transferred on the remittance dates is less than debt service then due and payable, the balance remaining unpaid shall be transferred to the General Fund out of the fund as soon as it shall become available, together with
 interest thereon from the remittance date until paid, at the same rate of interest as borne by the bonds, compounded semiannually. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, this subdivision shall apply to all veterans’ farm and home purchase bond acts pursuant to this chapter. This subdivision does not grant any lien on the fund, the Payment Fund, or the moneys therein to the holders of any bonds issued under this article. For the purposes of this subdivision, “debt service” means the principal (whether due at maturity, by redemption, or acceleration), premium, if any, or interest payable on any date with respect to any series of bonds. This subdivision shall not apply, however, in the case of any debt service that is payable from the proceeds of any refunding bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 27, Sec. 4.   (AB 2651)   Effective June 15, 2010.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, and approved in Prop. 12 on Nov. 4, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

998.405.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund, for purposes of this article, a sum of money that will equal both of the following:

(a) That sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and the interest on, the bonds issued and sold as provided herein, as that principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) That sum necessary to carry out Section 998.406,
 appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.406.

For the purposes of this article, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of a sum of money not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized by the committee to be sold pursuant to this article. Any sums withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. All moneys made available under this section to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund, plus the interest that the amounts would have earned in the Pooled
 Money Investment Account, from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.407.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purposes of carrying out this article. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of unsold bonds which the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article. The board shall execute whatever documents are required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and
 repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.408.

Upon request of the board, supported by a statement of its plans and projects approved by the Governor, the committee shall determine whether to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry out the board’s plans and projects, and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out these plans and projects progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds be issued or sold at any one
 time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.409.

As long as any bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall, at the close of each fiscal year, require a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of each survey and projection shall be reported in writing by the public accountant to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, the
 California Veterans Board, the appropriate policy committees dealing with veterans affairs in the Senate and the Assembly, and the committee.

The Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the public accountant for these services out of any money which the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.410.

The committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds authorized by this article at the time or times established by the Treasurer.

Whenever the committee deems it necessary for an effective sale of the bonds, the committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell any issue of bonds at less than their par value, notwithstanding Section 16754 of the Government Code. However, the discount on the bonds shall not exceed 3 percent of the par
 value thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.411.

Out of the first money realized from the sale of bonds as provided herein, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund, established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, the amount of all expenditures made for the purposes specified in that section, and this money may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional bond sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.412.

Any bonds issued and sold pursuant to this article may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The approval of the voters for the issuance of bonds under this article includes approval for the issuance of bonds issued to refund bonds originally issued or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.413.

Notwithstanding any provision of the bond act, if the Treasurer sells bonds under this article for which bond counsel has issued an opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excludable from gross income for purposes of federal income tax, subject to any conditions which may be designated, the Treasurer may establish separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the earnings on those proceeds, and may use those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other
 payment required by federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of bond proceeds required or permitted under federal law necessary to maintain the tax-exempt status of the bonds or to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.414.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this article are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by Article XIIIB.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5y. The Veterans Housing and Homeless Prevention Bond Act of 2014 [998.540. - 998.557.]

998.540.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Veterans Housing and Homeless Prevention Bond Act of 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.541.

(a) California is home to almost two million veterans, more than any other state in the nation, and with the winding down of the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan, an unprecedented number of California veterans will return to our communities, many in need of housing, employment, mental health and drug treatment, and physical rehabilitation.

(b) Unfortunately, California also leads the nation in the number of homeless veterans, roughly 25 percent of the nation’s homeless veterans live in California, approximately 19,000 veterans. According to the California Research Bureau, Los Angeles is number one in terms of the number of homeless veterans followed by the San Diego region at number three, and the San Francisco Bay Area at number nine.

(c) Moreover, the face of the nation’s homeless veterans’ population is changing as more OIF/OEF veterans find themselves in a downward spiral towards homelessness and, increasingly, female veterans and their children comprise more and more of the homeless veteran demographic.

(d) With their higher rates of post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse, and unemployment, as well as the higher incidence of sexual trauma
 experienced by our female veterans, current homeless veterans, all too often, cycle in and out of our jails, hospitals, and treatment programs, disproportionately drawing down services without receiving the proper services to stabilize their lives.

(e) The Legislature must advance a comprehensive, coordinated, and cost-effective approach to respond to the housing needs of our veterans. Such an approach should leverage public and private resources as well as align housing and services.

(f) Five years ago, Californians overwhelmingly affirmed their gratitude to our veterans by approving Proposition 12, a nine hundred million dollars ($900,000,000) general obligation bond intended to help veterans specifically purchase single family homes, farms, and mobilehomes through the CalVet Home Loan Program.

(g) As a result of
 the nation’s economic crisis and state’s housing downturn coupled with the changing demographics of our veterans, the Farm and Home Loan Program, as approved by Proposition 12, has been significantly undersubscribed. Five years since its passage, the full nine hundred million dollars ($900,000,000) remains unspent as does a portion of the five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) from Proposition 32, which was approved by the voters in 2000.

(h) Meanwhile, the need of veterans for multifamily housing that is affordable, supportive, and transitional remains unmet and public and private resources available for these purposes remain underutilized.

(i) California voters should be granted the opportunity to restructure the Proposition 12 veterans’ bond program to better respond to the housing needs as well as the changing demographics of the current veteran population.

(j) The Veterans Housing and Homeless Prevention Bond Act of 2014 will restructure six hundred million dollars ($600,000,000) of the existing Proposition 12 bond moneys to allow for the construction and rehabilitation of multifamily housing for veterans and prioritize projects that align housing with services. Even with this restructuring of bond moneys, the act still preserves over half a billion dollars for the existing CalVet Farm and Home Loan Program.

(k) The Veterans Housing and Homeless Prevention Bond Act of 2014 will expand housing and service options for veterans, cost-effectively leverage public dollars, reduce the number of homeless veterans and its attendant public costs, and place California at the forefront of our nation’s efforts to end veterans’ homelessness by 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.542.

(a) The State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), as amended from time to time, except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this
 article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to “herein” refer both to this article and that law.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the Department of Veterans Affairs is designated the board. The Department of Veterans Affairs shall carry out the board duties in consultation with the California Housing Finance Agency and the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.543.

As used herein, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(b) “Bond” means a veterans’ bond, a state general obligation bond, issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State
 General Obligation Bond Law.

(c) “Bond act” means this article authorizing the issuance of state general obligation bonds and adopting the State General Obligation Bond Law by reference.

(d) “Committee” means the Housing for Veterans Finance Committee, established pursuant to Section 998.547.

(e) “Fund” means the Housing for Veterans Fund, established pursuant to Section 998.544.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.544.

(a) Bonds in the total amount of six hundred million dollars ($600,000,000), or so much thereof as is necessary, not including the amount of any refunding bonds, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in subdivision (b) and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense
 Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this section shall be made available to the board for the purposes of creating a fund to provide multifamily housing to veterans and their families pursuant to the Veterans Housing and Homeless Prevention Act of 2014 (Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 987.001)), and any subsequent statutory enactment that amends that act or enacts or amends any successor act for the purpose of providing housing to veterans and their families.

(c) The Legislature may, from
 time to time, by majority vote, amend the provisions of this act for the purpose of improving program efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability, or for the purpose of furthering overall program goals.

(d) The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Housing for Veterans Fund, which is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.546.

The bonds authorized by this article shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law, except subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16727 of the Government Code, shall apply to the bonds
 and to this article and are hereby incorporated in this article as though set forth in full in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.547.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law of the bonds authorized by this article, the Housing for Veterans Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this article, the Housing for Veterans Finance Committee is “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee consists of the Controller, Treasurer, Director of Finance, Secretary of Business, Consumer Services, and Housing, and Secretary of Veterans Affairs, or their designated representatives. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2026, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 98.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.\n   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 99 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

998.547.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law of the bonds authorized by this article, the Housing for Veterans Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this article, the Housing for Veterans Finance Committee is “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee consists of the Controller, Treasurer, Director of Finance, Secretary of California Housing and Homelessness, and Secretary of Veterans Affairs, or their designated representatives. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1,
 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 98) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 99.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

998.548.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this article in order to carry out the actions specified in Section 998.544 and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds
 authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.549.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and
 every act that is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.550.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this article, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to
 this article, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 998.551, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.551.

For the purposes of carrying out this article, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be
 returned to the General Fund from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.552.

All money deposited in the fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold, in excess of any amount of premium used to pay costs of issuing the bonds, shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.553.

Pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, all or a portion of the cost of bond issuance may be paid out of the bond proceeds, including any premium derived from the sale of the bonds. These costs shall be shared proportionally by each program funded through this bond act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.554.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, including other authorized forms of interim financing that include, but are not limited to, commercial paper, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for purposes of carrying out this article. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold
 bonds that the committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article. The board shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.555.

The bonds may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this article includes the approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds
 originally issued under this article or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.556.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the investment of earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or take any
 other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds required or desirable under federal tax law or to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.557.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this article are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIII B of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Approved in Proposition 41 at the June 3, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5z. The Veterans and Affordable Housing Bond Act of 2018 [998.600. - 998.614.]

998.600.

Together with Part 16 (commencing with Section 54000) of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code, this article shall be known and may be cited as the Veterans and Affordable Housing Bond Act of 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

998.601.

(a) The State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), as amended from time to time, except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to “herein” refer both to this article and that law.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the Department of Veterans Affairs is designated the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

998.602.

As used herein, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(b) “Bond” means a veterans’ bond, a state general obligation bond, issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(c) “Bond act” means this article authorizing the issuance of state general obligation bonds and adopting the State General Obligation Bond Law by reference.

(d) “Committee” means the Veterans Finance Committee of 1943, established by Section 991.

(e) “Fund” means the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, established by Section 988.

(f) “Payment Fund” means the Veterans’ Bonds Payment Fund established by Section 988.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

998.603.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 (Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 987.50)), and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the committee may create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of not more than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000), exclusive of refunding bonds, in the manner provided herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

998.604.

(a) All bonds authorized by this article, when duly sold and delivered as provided herein, constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

(b) There shall be collected annually, in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, a sum of money, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, sufficient to pay the principal of, and interest on, these bonds as provided herein, and all officers required by law to perform any duty in regard to the collection of state revenues shall collect this additional sum.

(c) On the dates on which funds are to be remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of debt service on the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be transferred to the Payment Fund to pay the debt service all of the money in the fund, not in excess of the amount of debt service then due and payable. If the money transferred on the remittance dates is less than debt service then due and payable, the balance remaining unpaid shall be transferred to the General Fund out of the fund as soon as it shall become available, together with interest thereon from the remittance date until paid, at the same rate of interest as borne by the bonds, compounded semiannually. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, this subdivision shall apply to all veterans’ farm and home purchase bond acts pursuant to this chapter. This subdivision does not grant any lien on the fund, the Payment Fund, or the moneys therein to
 the holders of any bonds issued under this article. For the purposes of this subdivision, “debt service” means the principal (whether due at maturity, by redemption, or acceleration), premium, if any, or interest payable on any date with respect to any series of bonds. This subdivision shall not apply, however, in the case of any debt service that is payable from the proceeds of any refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

998.605.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund, for purposes of this article, a sum of money that will equal both of the following:

(a) That sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and the interest on, the bonds issued and sold as provided herein, as that principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) That sum necessary to carry out Section 998.606, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

998.606.

For the purposes of this article, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of a sum of money not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized by the committee to be sold pursuant to this article. Any sums withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. All moneys made available under this section to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund, plus the interest that the amounts would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

998.607.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purposes of carrying out this article. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of unsold bonds which the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article. The board shall execute whatever documents are required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

998.608.
